Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-652
Railroad train, defined.

Railroad train shall mean a steam engine or an engine with an electric or other motor, with or without cars coupled thereto, operated upon rails.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 148.